Utah statutes.
63A-14-703.   Chair as presiding judge.

(1)  Except as expressly provided otherwise in this chapter, the chair is vested with the power to direct the commission during meetings authorized by this chapter.

(2)  Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the commission may overrule a decision of the chair if:

(a)  a member of the commission:

(i)  states that the member desires to overrule the decision of the chair; and

(ii)  states the basis for the member's objection to the decision of the chair; and

(b)  a majority of the commission votes to overrule the decision of the chair.

(3)  The chair may set time limitations on any part of a meeting authorized by this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 426, 2013 General Session

